Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Commission for the Blind, for the  biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $9,497,634 for operations  of
the commission.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$1,148,422 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,  collected or received by the Commission for
the Blind.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$22,135,700 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Commission for the
Blind.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5003 (HB 5003-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 5, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5003 (HB 5003-A) Page 2